California, session 20252026, AB570.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2084 of the Insurance Code is amended to read:2084. (a) After a covered loss under a policy covered by Section 2071, an insurer shall provide to the insured, free of charge, a complete copy of the policy that was in effect at the time of the loss within 30 15 calendar days of receipt of a request from the insured. The time period for providing the policy may be extended by the Insurance Commissioner. The policy provided to the insured shall include, where applicable and without limitation, the full insurance policy, any endorsements to the policy, and the policy declarations page.(b) An insured under a policy covered by Section 2071 who does not experience a covered loss shall, upon request, be entitled to one free copy of his or her their policy annually. The policy provided to the insured shall include, where applicable and without limitation, the full insurance policy, any endorsements to the policy, and the policy declarations page.(c) (1) An insurer responding to a request made pursuant to subdivision (a) for a covered loss that was the result of a state of emergency, as defined in Section 8558 of the Government Code, may, and an insurer compliant with the electronic transaction requirements of Section 38.6 shall, upon the request of an insured who has not elected to receive electronic documents pursuant to Section 38.6, transmit or provide access to an electronic copy of the entire policy. Section 38.6 shall not apply to transmitting or providing access to a policy pursuant to this paragraph.(2) A request of an insured pursuant to paragraph (1) does not constitute a request to participate in electronic transactions or communications for any purpose other than receiving the documents described in this section.